New York, session 2025-2026, A6146.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. Effective July 1, 1989 2 customers who wish to block "adult" messages, group calling services or 3 recorded information and entertainment services from their phones have 4 had to pay a five dollar fee. The legislature finds that customers 5 should not have to pay to block a service they never requested and that 6 this blocking option should be made available free of charge. 7 § 2. Section 91 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 8 subdivision 15 to read as follows: 9 15. (a) The cost for providing blocking services and informing custom- 10 ers thereof, shall be borne by the telephone company providing the 11 blocking service, and shall not be included in that telephone company's 12 rate base. 13 (b) The public service commission shall promulgate the appropriate 14 rules and regulations within one hundred twenty days of the effective 15 date of this subdivision. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08714-01-5